test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lyekaTS_gt-norm.yaml
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыдиʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекынаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыдаˮ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: лекыдоʼ
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекынась
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдась
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдась
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекынинзь
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдинзь
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдинзь
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекынаць
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдаць
     лека+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: лекыдонзь
     лека+N+Tra: лекаӈэ
     лека+N+Car: лекасиˮ
     лека+N+Equ: лекадаремʼ
     лека+N+Equ+Lat: лекадаревʼ
